Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Governmental Agencies, Owners, Police Officers and Other Persons Defined

§ 63-3-115.
Department of public safety.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of public safety.

“Department” means the department of public safety.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8133; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-117.
Local authorities.

“Local authority” means every county, municipal, and other local board or body having authority to adopt local police regulations under the constitution and laws of this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8136; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-119.
Police officers.

“Police officer” means every officer authorized to direct or regulate traffic or to make arrests for violations of traffic regulations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8135; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-121.
Individuals.

“Person” means every natural person, firm, copartnership, association, corporation, limited liability company or other legal business entity.

“Driver” means every person who drives or is in actual physical control of a vehicle.

“Owner” means a person who holds the legal title of a vehicle; in the event a vehicle is the subject of an agreement for the conditional sale or lease thereof with the right of purchase upon performance of the conditions stated in the agreement and with an immediate right of possession vested in the conditional vendee or lessee, or in the event a mortgagor of a vehicle is entitled to possession, then such conditional vendee or lessee or mortgagor shall be deemed the owner for the purpose of this chapter.

“Pedestrian” means any person afoot or a person who uses an electric personal assistive mobility device or a manual or motorized wheelchair.

“Instructor” means any person who gives instruction in a course related to this Title 63, whether given in person, recorded, transmitted by electronic means, or any combination thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8134; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 2003, ch. 485, § 10; Laws, 2012, ch. 544, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 26, 2012.).